Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 10. Attorneys.

Sec. 34.35.430.
Attorney’s lien.

An attorney has a lien for compensation, whether specially agreed upon or implied, as provided in this section

first, upon the papers of the client that have come into the possession of the attorney in the course of the professional employment;

second, upon money in the possession of the attorney belonging to the client;

third, upon money in the possession of the adverse party in an action or proceeding in which the attorney is employed, from the giving of notice of the lien to that party;

fourth, upon a judgment to the extent of the costs included in the judgment or, if there is a special agreement, to the extent of the compensation specially agreed on, from the giving of notice of the lien to the party against whom the judgment is given and filing the original with the clerk where the judgment is entered and docketed.

The lien described in (a) of this section is superior to all subsequent liens except tax liens. The lien is a charge on the action, and the parties to the action may not extinguish or affect the attorney’s lien by any means, including settlement, other than by satisfying the underlying claim of the attorney for the fees and costs incurred in connection with the action. Nothing in this subsection precludes a party from contesting an attorney’s lien under applicable law.

History.

(§ 26-8-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 149 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the power of courts to make orders under AS

22.20.080

where an attorney claims a lien on money or papers under this section, see AS

22.20.090

.